Missouri, session 2026, SB1049.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 67 and 442, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 67.5360
and 442.561, to read as follows:
67.5360. 1. The governing body in any political
subdivision shall not procure, authorize, or approve a
development agreement, building plan, or any other proposal
relating to development of the political subdivision with an
individual or government identified as a foreign adversary
as defined in 15 CFR 7.4(a).
2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
foreign adversary possessing an interest in real property if
the foreign adversary:
(1) Is a duly registered business and has maintained a
status of good standing with the office of the secretary of
state for seven years or longer prior to August 28, 2026;
(2) Has been approved by the United States Committee
on Foreign Investment under 50 U.S.C. Section 4565; and
(3) Maintains an active national security agreement
with the federal government.

SB 1049 2
442.561. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the following governments or entities
shall not purchase, hold, or otherwise acquire title to real
property in this state:
(1) A foreign government listed as a foreign
adversary; or
(2) A foreign business entity that is:
(a) Headquartered in a country that is a foreign
adversary;
(b) Directly or indirectly held or controlled by a
foreign adversary;
(c) Owned by the majority of stock or other ownership
interests which are held or controlled by individuals who
are citizens of a foreign adversary; or
(d) A company owned by, or the majority of stock or
other ownership interest which are held or controlled by, a
company or entity described in paragraph (c) of this
subdivision.
2. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
foreign adversary possessing an interest in real property if
the foreign adversary:
(1) Is a duly registered business and has maintained a
status of good standing with the office of the secretary of
state for seven years or longer prior to August 28, 2026;
(2) Has been approved by the United States Committee
on Foreign Investment under 50 U.S.C. Section 4565; and
(3) Maintains an active national security agreement
with the federal government.
3. For purposes of this section, "foreign adversary"
means an individual or government identified as a foreign
adversary in 15 CFR 7.4(a).
✓